Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1210
Act; remedies cumulative.

The remedies provided in the Nebraska Collegiate Athletic Association Procedures Act are cumulative and in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 10.